Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1324.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2709.2. Bullying.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of bullying when the person commits a defined crime with the intent to:(1) harass, annoy, alarm or intimidate another individual or group of individuals; or(2) place another individual or group of individuals in fear of bodily injury or property damage.(b) Grading.--(1) An offense under this section shall be classified as 1234567891011121314151617 a misdemeanor of the third degree if the defined crime is classified as a summary offense.(2) Except as provided under paragraph (1), the following shall apply:(i) An offense under this section shall be classified one degree higher in the classification specified in section 106 (relating to classes of offenses) than the classification of the defined crime.(ii) The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for sentencing enhancements for cases in which the defined crime is classified at the highest degree.(c) False report.--A person who knowingly gives false information to a law enforcement officer with the intent to implicate a person under this section commits an offense under section 4906 (relating to false reports to law enforcement authorities).(d) Venue.--(1) An offense committed under this section may be deemed to have been committed at the place where the communications or actions were made or received.(2) Acts indicating a course of conduct that occur in more than one jurisdiction may be used by any other jurisdiction in which an act occurred as evidence of a continuing pattern of conduct or a course of conduct.(e) Application of section.--This section shall not apply to conduct by a party to a labor dispute as defined in the act of June 2, 1937 (P.L.1198, No.308), known as the Labor Anti-Injunction Act, or to any constitutionally protected activity.20250HB1324PN1516 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "defined crime" means an offense under any of the following:(1) Chapter 27 (relating to assault), exclusive of sections 2709 (relating to harassment) and 2709.1 (relating to stalking).(2) Chapter 33 (relating to arson, criminal mischief and other property destruction), exclusive of section 3307 (relating to institutional vandalism).(3) Chapter 35 (relating to burglary and other criminal intrusion), exclusive of section 3503 (relating to criminal trespass).(4) Chapter 41 (relating to forgery and fraudulent practices).(5) Section 5503 (relating to disorderly conduct). (6) Chapter 57 (relating to wiretapping and electronic surveillance).(7) Section 7507.1 (relating to invasion of privacy). (8) Chapter 76 (relating to computer offenses).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1324PN1516 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819